Texas statutes.
BUSINESS AND COMMERCE CODE

TITLE 5. REGULATION OF BUSINESSES AND SERVICES

SUBTITLE C. BUSINESS OPERATIONS

CHAPTER 101. INTERNATIONAL MATCHMAKING ORGANIZATIONS

Sec. 101.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Basic rights information" means information applicable to a noncitizen, including information about human rights, immigration, and emergency assistance and resources.

(2) "Client" means a person who is a resident of the United States and who contracts with an international matchmaking organization to meet recruits.

(3) "Criminal history record information" means criminal history record information obtained from the Department of Public Safety under Subchapter F, Chapter 411, Government Code, and from the Federal Bureau of Investigation under Section 411.087, Government Code.

(4) "International matchmaking organization" means a corporation, partnership, sole proprietorship, or other legal entity that does business in the United States and offers to residents of this state dating, matrimonial, or social referral services involving recruits by:

(A) exchanging names, telephone numbers, addresses, or statistics;

(B) selecting photographs; or

(C) providing a social environment for introducing clients to recruits in a country other than the United States.

(5) "Marital history information" means a declaration of a person's current marital status, the number of times the person has been married, and whether any marriage occurred as a result of receiving services from an international matchmaking organization.

(6) "Recruit" means a person who:

(A) is not a citizen or resident of the United States; and

(B) is recruited by an international matchmaking organization for the purpose of providing dating, matrimonial, or social referral services.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 885 (H.B. 2278), Sec. 2.01, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 101.002. PROVIDING CRIMINAL HISTORY, MARITAL HISTORY, AND BASIC RIGHTS INFORMATION. (a) An international matchmaking organization shall provide each recruit with the criminal history record information and marital history information of the organization's clients and with basic rights information.

(b) The information under Subsection (a) must:

(1) be in the recruit's native language; and

(2) be displayed in a manner that:

(A) separates the criminal history record information, the marital history information, and the basic rights information from any other information; and

(B) is highly noticeable.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 885 (H.B. 2278), Sec. 2.01, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 101.003. PROVIDING ADDITIONAL CRIMINAL HISTORY, MARITAL HISTORY, AND BASIC RIGHTS INFORMATION. (a) An international matchmaking organization shall disseminate to a recruit the criminal history record information and marital history information of a client and the basic rights information not later than the 30th day after the date the organization receives the criminal history record information and the marital history information from the client.

(b) The international matchmaking organization shall provide the information to the recruit in the recruit's native language. The organization shall pay the costs incurred to translate the information.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 885 (H.B. 2278), Sec. 2.01, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 101.004. OBTAINING CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD INFORMATION AND MARITAL HISTORY INFORMATION. (a) A client shall:

(1) obtain a copy of the client's own criminal history record information;

(2) provide the criminal history record information to the international matchmaking organization; and

(3) provide the client's own marital history information to the international matchmaking organization.

(b) The international matchmaking organization shall require the client to affirm that the marital history information is complete and accurate and includes information regarding marriages, annulments, and dissolutions that occurred in another state or a foreign country.

(c) The international matchmaking organization may not provide any further services to the client or the recruit until the organization has:

(1) obtained the requested criminal history record information and marital history information; and

(2) provided the information to the recruit.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 885 (H.B. 2278), Sec. 2.01, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 101.005. CIVIL PENALTY. (a) An international matchmaking organization that violates this chapter is subject to a civil penalty not to exceed $20,000 for each violation.

(b) In determining the amount of the civil penalty, the court shall consider:

(1) any previous violations of this chapter by the international matchmaking organization;

(2) the seriousness of the violation, including the nature, circumstances, extent, and gravity of the violation;

(3) the demonstrated good faith of the international matchmaking organization; and

(4) the amount necessary to deter future violations.

(c) The attorney general or the appropriate district or county attorney may bring an action under this section in the name of the state in a district court in:

(1) Travis County; or

(2) a county in which any part of the violation occurs.

(d) A penalty collected under this section by the attorney general or a district or county attorney shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the compensation to victims of crime fund established under Subchapter J, Chapter 56B, Code of Criminal Procedure.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 885 (H.B. 2278), Sec. 2.01, eff. April 1, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 469 (H.B. 4173), Sec. 2.01, eff. January 1, 2021.